cs: Trhaný tvar: Kousky (bites); Žvýkací kousky (chews); Chipsy; Špalky (chunks); Nugety; Trhané; Plátky (slabs); Tyčinky (sticks); Pásky (strips); Jiné
pl: forma suszonego mięsa: Kąski; Do żucia; Chipsy; Kawałki; Nuggetsy; Wiórki; Płaty; Paluszki; Paski; Inna
sk-SK: Forma sušeného mäsa: Kúsky; Žuvacie kúsky; Lupienky; Kusy; Nugety; Drvené; Plátky; Tyčinky; Pásiky; Iné
nl: Jerky vorm: Bites; Kauwstrips; Chips; Brokken; Nuggets; Versnipperd; Plakken; Sticks; Strips; Overig
th: รูปแบบเนื้อแห้ง: แบบพอดีคำ; แบบเคี้ยว; แบบแผ่นกรอบ; แบบก้อน; แบบนักเก็ต; แบบฝอย; แบบแผ่นหนา; แบบแท่ง; แบบเส้น; อื่นๆ
ru: Форма джерки: Кусочки (bites); Жевательные палочки; Чипсы; Крупные кусочки; Наггетсы; Измельченное; Пластины; Палочки; Полоски; Другое
de: Form des Trockenfleischs: Häppchen; Kausnacks; Chips; Brocken; Nuggets; Zerkleinert; Scheiben; Sticks; Streifen; Sonstige
ko: 육포 형태: 바이트; 츄; 칩; 청크; 너겟; 채 썬 형태; 슬래브; 스틱; 스트립; 기타
da: Form på jerky: Bites; Chews; Chips; Stykker; Nuggets; Revet; Plader; Stænger; Strimler; Andet
it: Forma della carne secca: Bocconcini; Strisce; Chips; Tocchetti; Bocconcini; Sfilacciata; A fette spesse; Bastoncini; Strisce; Altro
nb: Rykkete form: Biter; Tyggebiter; Chips; Grove biter; Nuggets; Strimlet; Skiver; Pinner; Strimler; Annet
ja: ジャーキーの形: バイト; チュー; チップス; チャンク; ナゲット; シュレッド; スラブ; スティック; ストリップ; その他
tr: Kurutulmuş et formu: Lokmalık; Çiğnemelik; Cips; İri parçalar; Nugget; Kıyılmış; Yassı dilim; Çubuk; Şerit; Diğer
sl-SI: Oblika sušenega mesa: Grižljaji; Žvečilke; Čips; Koščki; Kroketi; Natrgano; Rezine; Palčke; Trakovi; Drugo
es: Carne seca: Bocados; Masticables; Chips; Trozos; Nuggets; Desmenuzada; Lajas; Palitos; Tiras; Otro
sv: Jerky-form: Bitar; Tuggbitar; Chips; Stora bitar; Nuggets; Strimlad; Skivor; Sticks; Remsor; Annat
hr-HR: Trzavi oblik: Zalogaji; Žvakalice; Čips; Komadi; Grumeni; Trgano; Kriške; Štapići; Trakice; Ostalo
ro-RO: Formă sacadată: Bucăți mici; Batoane masticabile; Chipsuri; Bucăți; Nuggets; Mărunțită; Plăci; Batoane; Fâșii; Altele
zh-CN: 肉干形态: 咬块; 咀嚼条; 脆片; 肉块; 肉粒; 肉丝; 肉片; 肉条; 切条; 其他
lt-LT: Džiovintos mėsos forma: Kąsneliai; Kramtukai; Traškučiai; Gabalėliai; Grynuoliai; Plėšytas; Lakštai; Lazdelės; Juostelės; Kita
pt-PT: Forma da carne seca: Pedaços; Mastigáveis; Chips; Pedaços grossos; Nuggets; Desfiado; Fatias; Palitos; Tiras; Outro
hu: Szárított hús formája: Falatok; Rágófalatok; Csipszek; Darabok; Falatkák; Tépett; Lapok; Rudak; Csíkok; Egyéb
vi: Hình dạng thịt khô: Miếng vừa ăn; Dạng nhai; Miếng mỏng; Cục; Viên; Xé sợi; Miếng to; Dạng que; Dải; Khác
pt-BR: Jerky formato: Pedaços; Mastigáveis; Chips; Pedaços grandes; Nuggets; Desfiado; Pedaços grandes; Palitos; Tiras; Outro
fr: Forme de la viande séchée: Bouchées; À mâcher; Chips; Morceaux; Pépites; Effiloché; Plaques; Bâtonnets; Lanières; Autre
zh-TW: 肉乾形式: 一口吃; 嚼塊; 脆片; 塊狀; 雞塊狀; 絲狀; 片狀; 條狀; 帶狀; 其他
el: Μορφή αποξηραμένου κρέατος (Jerky): Μπουκιές; Μαστιχωτά; Τσιπς; Μεγάλα κομμάτια; Nuggets; Τριμμένο; Πλάκες; Στικς; Λωρίδες; Άλλο
bg-BG: Форма на сушеното месо: Хапки; За дъвчене; Чипс; Едри парчета; Нъгети; Настъргано; Плочи; Пръчици; Ленти; Друга
fi: Kuivalihan muoto: Palat; Purupalat; Lastut; Isot palat; Nugetit; Revitty; Levyt; Tikut; Suikaleet; Muu
en: Jerky form: Bites; Chews; Chips; Chunks; Nuggets; Shredded; Slabs; Sticks; Strips; Other